Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-736. Calculation of final average salary — Definition.

Compensation in excess of the limitations set forth in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17), as it existed on January 1, 2011, shall not be used for purposes of calculating final average salary on which benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be based.

The limitation on compensation for an eligible employee shall not be less than the amount that was allowed to be taken into account under the system as in effect on July 1, 1993.

As used in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, “eligible employee” means an individual who was a member of the system before the first plan year beginning after December 31, 1995.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall set annually the applicable number of years to be used in computing final average salary for retirement benefits at not less than three (3) years and not more than five (5) years.

Full service years that are recorded as service credit shall be used in the calculation of the final average salary.

If the member does not have full service years for the total years of service used in the calculation of final average salary, then the board may establish by rule a fair base year for a member's final average salary for purposes of comparison under subdivision (c)(3) of this section.

If a member has less than the minimum number of years of credited service required for the final average salary formula, the final average salary of the member shall be the total salary paid to the member for his or her years of credited service divided by the member's total credited years of service.

Before reducing the number of years that is used to determine the final average salary, the board shall file relevant information concerning the actuarial appropriateness of the action with the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs for review by the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs.

The applicable number of highest salary years shall be ranked from lowest to highest remuneration.

The lowest remuneration year in the ranking shall be the base year.

The next-highest-ranked remuneration year shall be compared to the base year.

The next-highest year's value in the calculation of final average salary shall not exceed the percentage increase of the base year, unless the difference in value between the next-highest year and the base year is within the amount of the salary differential.

After comparison of the base year to the next-highest year, any required reduction to the next-highest year shall be made.

The next-highest year, with any required reduction, becomes the new base year to compare to the next succeeding highest remuneration year in the ranking until all years in the ranking have been compared to its base and reduced as necessary under subdivision (c)(3) of this section.

The total value of the base years shall then be averaged to determine final average salary.

If a member has a break in covered employment for eight (8) years or more between any of the member's highest salary years used in the calculation of final average salary, then subdivision (c)(3)(D) of this section shall not apply to the next highest salary year in the formula.

The system may settle any dispute concerning an employee's salary for purposes of the system.

The board may adjust the final average salary calculated in accordance with subsection (c) of this section by board resolution provided that:

The percentage increase under subdivision (c)(3)(D) of this section is adjusted no lower than one hundred five percent (105%) per year and no higher than one hundred twenty percent (120%) per year; and

The salary differential permitted under subdivision (c)(3)(D) of this section is set no lower than one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250) per year and no higher than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year.

A partial service year is excluded from the calculation of the final average salary under this subsection.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 225, § 2; 2017, No. 611, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 427, §§ 18, 19.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (c)(3)(D), substituted “the percentage increase” for “one hundred twenty percent (120%)” and “within the amount of the salary differential” for “five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less”; and added (f).

The 2019 amendment, in (c)(1), inserted “annually” and added “at not less than three (3) years and not more than five (5) years”; rewrote (c)(2)(A); added (c)(2)(C) and (D); and rewrote (f).

24-7-737. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning salary contracts and additional remuneration, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 521, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 2011, No. 225, § 2.

24-7-738. Return to regular covered employment for service credit after disability retirement — Alternate option to return to disability retirement — Incentive to work.

If a member who has been on disability retirement with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System returns to regular, covered employment and then returns to disability retirement with the system, the disability retirement benefit shall be the higher of the:

Amount that the member would have received if he or she did not return to regular, covered employment; or

Recomputed benefit using the additional salary and additional service credit earned by the member under the covered employment.

A member who returns to covered employment under this section after disability retirement shall not receive a disability retirement benefit from the system in any month that the member is paid a salary from a covered employer for a work period that is concurrent with the receipt of the disability retirement.

Any disability retirement benefit erroneously paid to the member or retirant for a month in which the member receives salary from a covered employer may be recovered by the system as an overpayment as allowed by law.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 549, § 8.

Subchapter 8
— Alternate Plan for State Colleges

Cross References.

Certain employees of educational institutions to be members of Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, § 24-7-1002.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1967, No. 436, § 11: Mar. 16, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that Arkansas colleges now need to recruit many teachers and staff members to accommodate the ever-growing number of students who enroll; that competition for the services of high class educators and staff members has developed; that in making a choice of employment, teachers and staff members place much stress on the adequacy and transportability of pension and retirement benefits; that in order to retain teachers and staff members who are now employed, and in order to employ new teachers and staff members of high quality, it is necessary that Arkansas offer, with as little delay as possible, a retirement plan which will prove acceptable. Now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 622, § 3: May 13, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 232 of 1969 which revised certain provisions of Act 436 of 1967, relating to participation by college and university staff members in an alternate retirement plan was designed to take effect on July 1, 1969, but did not contain an emergency clause and therefore due to the extension of the regular session will not take effect until well after July 1, and that it is essential to the proper and efficient administration of the alternate retirement plan provided in Act 436 of 1967 that the provisions contained in Act 232 of 1969 become effective on or before July 1, 1969. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 227, § 2: Mar. 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the intent of the Teacher Retirement Law and the Alternate Retirement Plan for teachers and administrative officers of colleges and universities supported by the State of Arkansas was and still is that a person shall qualify for an annuity from the Teacher Retirement System only when he retires from covered employment. It is further found and determined that the present wording of subparagraph (1) of paragraph (d) of Section 4 of Act 436 of 1967 as amended is causing confusion about the intent of the General Assembly, and that there is uncertainty in administration of this provision of law and clarification of this provision is needed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 511, § 10: Mar. 13, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the Arkansas Department of Higher Education needs to recruit personnel from higher education institutions and employees of other state agencies to accommodate the demands made upon the department; that in making a choice of employment, staff members place much stress on the adequacy and transportability of pension and retirement benefits; that in order to retain staff members who are now employed, and to employ new staff members of high quality, it is necessary that Arkansas offer a retirement plan that is acceptable and does not penalize employees for transfers from institutions of higher education or other public employment. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 299, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that certain college and university employees under the Teacher Retirement System need additional time to determine whether or not to elect to be covered by an alternate retirement plan, that current law does not extend an adequate period for those persons to make an educated selection of the alternatives, and that the change in the law is necessary to the continued efficient and effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 332, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain staff members of the Arkansas Technical and Community College system are unable to achieve an equitable retirement under the current provisions of Arkansas law; that the retirement laws regarding alternate retirement plans in Arkansas need to be changed to solve this inequitable situation; and that those laws need to be amended and this act needs to be effective at the beginning of the state fiscal biennium to continue the effective and efficient operation of the Arkansas Technical and Community College system in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to promote effectiveness in state government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 944, § 6: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty- First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain staff members of the technical colleges, post-secondary vocational-technical schools and the Division of Vocational-Technical Education are unable to achieve an equitable retirement under the current provisions of Arkansas law for an alternate retirement plan; that the retirement laws regarding alternate retirement plans in Arkansas need to be changed to solve this inequitable situation; and that those laws need to be amended and this act needs to become effective at the beginning of the State's fiscal year to promote the proper operation of the vocational-technical colleges and schools in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to promote the effective financial administration of state government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 28: July 1, 1998.

Acts 1999, No. 908, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain staff members of the technical colleges, post-secondary vocational-technical schools and the Department of Workforce Education are unable to achieve an equitable retirement under the current provisions of Arkansas law for an alternate retirement plan; that the retirement laws regarding alternate retirement plans in Arkansas need to be changed to solve this inequitable situation; and that those laws need to be amended and this act needs to become effective at the beginning of the state's fiscal year to promote the proper operation of the vocational-technical colleges and schools in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to promote the effective financial administration of state government, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 1784, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that that certain staff members of the technical colleges, post-secondary vocational-technical schools and the Department of Workforce Education are unable to achieve an equitable retirement under the current provisions of Arkansas law for an alternate retirement plan; that the retirement laws regarding alternate retirement plans in Arkansas need to be changed to solve this inequitable situation; and that those laws need to be amended and this act needs to become effective at the beginning of the state's fiscal year to promote the proper operation of the vocational-technical colleges and schools in Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-7-801. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Alternate retirement plan” means a retirement plan based on the purchase of contracts providing retirement and death benefits for the employees of Arkansas State University, the Division of Higher Education employees, and employees of Arkansas's state-supported universities, colleges, or junior colleges that are not a part of the University of Arkansas system;

“Board” means the governing body of a college;

“College” means any one (1) of the state-supported universities, colleges, and junior colleges not a part of the University of Arkansas system, and Arkansas State University;

“Division employees” means the Director of the Division of Higher Education and the professional education employees of the division;

“Retirement system” means the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“Staff members” means any employee of a college or university who is eligible for membership in any retirement plan;

“State” means the State of Arkansas; and

“State board” means the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 436, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1457; Acts 1991, No. 511, § 1; 2001, No. 765, § 1;
2019, No. 910, §§ 2371, 2372.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “department” in (1); and substituted “Division” for “Department” throughout (4).

24-7-802. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning construction of the subchapter, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 332, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1967, No. 436, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1464.

24-7-803. Provisions of subchapter controlling.

Insofar as the provisions of this subchapter are, or may be, inconsistent with the provisions of any other general or special act, the provisions of this subchapter shall be controlling.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 436, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1464n.

24-7-804. Establishment and administration of plan.

The board of any college and the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board may establish and maintain an alternate retirement plan which shall authorize the purchase of contracts providing retirement and death benefits for staff members and employees of the Division of Higher Education.

Under the plan, staff members and division employees shall contribute, to the extent authorized or required, toward the purchase of the contracts, which shall be issued to and become the property of the participants.

The board of any college which elects to establish and maintain an alternate retirement plan and the Director of the Division of Higher Education, if it elects to establish and maintain a plan, shall have authority to administer the plan and to perform or authorize the performance of all such functions as may be reasonably appropriate in its administration.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 436, §§ 2, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-1458, 80-1463; Acts 1991, No. 511, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2373.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” at the end of (a) and in (c); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

24-7-805. Methods of providing benefits — Agent for service of process.

An alternate retirement plan may be a separate system or fund or may be one which participates in a larger system or fund with respect to some or all of the benefits provided thereunder.

The benefits to be provided for or on behalf of staff members and employees of the Division of Higher Education under an alternate retirement plan may be provided through insurance policies and annuity contracts, both fixed and variable in nature, or a combination thereof, as specified in the plan, which insurance policies and annuity contracts may be obtained from any insurance company authorized to do business in this state or from any nonprofit company organized and operated exclusively for the purpose of aiding and strengthening educational or scientific institutions by issuing insurance or annuity contracts only to or for the benefit of such institutions or individuals engaged in their services.

In any action brought by a staff member or division employee on a policy or contract, any official of the college or the Director of the Division of Higher Education shall be deemed to be the agent of the nonprofit company only for the purpose of service of process on the contract or policy, and for no other purpose.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 436, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1459; Acts 1991, No. 511, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 2374.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (b) and (c); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c).

24-7-806. Procedure for designation of companies to provide benefit contracts.

The board of each college or university, or the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, shall designate the companies from which contracts are to be purchased under the alternate retirement plan and shall approve the form and contents of the contracts.

In making the designation and giving the approval, the board or state board shall give due consideration to:

The nature and extent of the rights and benefits to be provided by the contracts for staff members and their beneficiaries;

The relation of the rights and benefits to the amount of contributions to be made pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter;

The suitability of the rights and benefits to the needs of the staff members and the interests of the college in the recruitment and retention of staff members; and

The ability of the designated company or companies to provide the suitable rights and benefits under the contracts.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 436, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1462; Acts 1991, No. 511, § 4; 1993, No. 443, § 1;
2019, No. 910, § 2375.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” following “Coordinating Board of the” in (a).

24-7-807. Participation in plan.

Participation in an alternate retirement plan established pursuant to this subchapter shall be as follows:

Any staff member employed or appointed by a college or university on or after the establishment of its alternate retirement plan shall participate in the plan or in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

Any staff member employed or appointed by a college or university prior to July 1, 1969, who is a member of the retirement system shall continue in that membership or shall participate in the alternate retirement plan, as provided in this subchapter;

Any staff member employed or appointed by a college or university with less than ten (10) years of member service in the retirement system may elect to terminate his or her membership in the retirement system and participate in the alternate retirement plan established by the employing college or university.

The election shall be in writing and filed with the retirement system and the disbursing officer of the employing college or university within one (1) year after he or she becomes eligible to participate in the alternate retirement plan, except that, on or after July 1, 1993, until December 31, 1993, any staff member employed or appointed by a college or university who has less than ten (10) years of member service in the retirement system and who has not already so elected may elect to terminate his or her membership in the retirement system and participate in the alternate retirement plan established by the employing college or university. The election shall be in writing and filed with the retirement system and the disbursing officer of the employing college or university.

All accumulated contributions to the credit of the staff member in the members' deposit account which is maintained pursuant to the provisions of § 24-7-406 shall be returned to the staff member, and all of his or her credited service under the retirement system shall be cancelled;

Any staff member employed or appointed by a college or university with five (5) or more years of actual service who elects to participate only in the alternate retirement plan and who has left his or her contributions in the retirement system shall be eligible to receive an annuity on or after attaining sixty (60) years of age and on his or her retirement from covered employment.

The amount of the annuity shall be determined by the benefit formula of the retirement system at the time of his or her retirement.

The election authorized under subdivision (4)(A) of this section shall be made in writing and filed with the retirement system and with the disbursing officer of the employing college or university on or before July 1 of the year in which the person makes the election to participate in the alternate retirement plan.

The person's annuity shall begin on the first day of the month following the date his or her application for retirement is filed with the board of trustees on or after his or her attainment of age sixty (60);

Any Division of Higher Education employee who transferred from another state department or division covered by a state-supported retirement system may elect to participate in an alternate retirement plan.

The employee shall file written notice of his or her election with the Director of the Division of Higher Education.

Any division employee with five (5) or more years of actual service who elects to participate only in the alternate retirement plan and who has left his or her contributions in the retirement system shall be eligible to receive an annuity on or after attaining the normal retirement age and on his or her retirement from covered employment.

The amount of the annuity shall be determined by the benefit formula of the retirement system at the time of his or her retirement.

The election authorized under this subdivision (5) shall be made in writing and filed with the retirement system and with the director on or before July 1 of the year in which the person makes the election to participate in the alternate retirement plan.

The person's annuity shall begin on the first day of the month following the date his or her application for retirement is filed with the board of trustees on or after his or her attainment of normal retirement age and on his or her retirement from covered employment.

Effective July 1, 2001, staff members who elect to participate in an alternate retirement plan may elect to become members of the retirement system.

Service credit forfeited while a member of an alternate retirement plan cannot be established in the retirement system.

The election to withdraw from the alternate retirement plan and become a member of the retirement system shall be made by December 31, 2001, and notice of the election shall be made in writing and filed with the retirement system and the disbursing officer of the employing college or university by December 31, 2001.

Each college or university shall provide to each new employee of the college or university a written document explaining to the employee each of his or her retirement plan options.

The written document shall contain a line for the employee's signature verifying that he or she understands his or her retirement plan options.

The signed document shall be added to the employee's personnel file.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 436, § 4; 1969, No. 232, § 1; 1969, No. 622, § 1; 1975, No. 235, § 1; 1979, No. 227, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1460; Acts 1991, No. 511, § 5; 1993, No. 299, § 1; 1995, No. 332, § 1; 1997, No. 944, § 1; 1997, No. 1053, § 10; 1999, No. 908, § 1; 2001, No. 1784, § 1; 2007, No. 831, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2376.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (5)(A)(i) and (5)(A)(ii); inserted “or division” in (5)(A)(i); and substituted “division” for “department” in (5)(B)(i).

24-7-808. Contributions.

Any college or university which elects to establish and maintain an alternate retirement plan, and the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board if it so elects, shall contribute to that plan on behalf of each staff member who elects to participate in the alternate retirement plan, or employee of the Division of Higher Education, six percent (6%) of his or her total regular compensation during the continuance of his or her employment.

Each staff member who elects to participate in the alternate retirement plan, or division employee, at the discretion of the college or university, shall also contribute thereto six percent (6%) of his or her total regular compensation.

At its discretion, the division, college, or university may contribute a minimum of an additional four percent (4%) of the staff member's total regular compensation.

The division, college, or university may contribute an amount so that the percentage rate in subdivision (a)(1) of this section plus the additional rate in subdivision (b)(1) of this section equals the total employer contribution rate under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System if the college or university determines that sufficient funds are available to pay that contribution rate.

Each staff member may be required to match that additional contribution by contributing a percentage of his or her total regular compensation as determined by the division, college, or university.

In addition to the contributions defined in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the division or any college or university which elects to establish and maintain an alternate retirement plan may permit a newly eligible employee who elects to establish and maintain an alternate retirement plan and may permit a newly eligible employee who elects to participate in an alternate retirement plan to make incremental increases in plan contributions to reach the required contribution level by completion of the fourth year of participation in the alternate retirement plan.

Payment of contributions authorized by this section shall be made by the disbursing officer of the college or university and by the state official charged with the duty of paying salaries to division employees to the designated companies in accordance with the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 436, § 5; 1969, No. 232, § 2; 1969, No. 622, § 2; 1979, No. 726, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1461; Acts 1991, No. 511, § 6; 2001, No. 765, § 2; 2005, No. 1287, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2377.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Subchapter 9
— Alternate Plan for Vocational-Technical Schools

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 480, § 11: Mar. 16, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that Arkansas Post Secondary Vocational-Technical Schools and the Division now need to recruit many teachers and staff members to accommodate the ever-growing number of students who enroll; that competition with other institutions and businesses for the services of competent vocational educators and staff members has developed; that in making a choice of employment, staff members place much stress on the adequacy and transportability of pension and retirement benefits; that in order to improve the retention of staff members who are now employed, and in order to employ new teachers and staff members of high quality, it is necessary that Arkansas offer, with as little delay as possible, a retirement plan which will prove acceptable. Now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 4: June 26, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present laws relating to State Group Health Insurance do not specifically authorize retired instructors and administrative staff of vocational-technical schools and retired members of the Vocational-Technical Division to participate in the State group health insurance plan; that this oversight should be corrected immediately in order to avoid hardship and in equity to such personnel; that this Act is designed to correct this undesirable situation and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 4: June 26, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present laws relating to State Group Health Insurance does not specifically authorize retired instructors and administrative staff of vocational-technical schools and retired members of the Vocational-Technical Division to participate in the State group health insurance plan; that this oversight should be corrected immediately in order to avoid hardship and in equity to such personnel; that this Act is designed to correct this undesirable situation and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 979, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain staff members of the post-secondary vocational-technical schools and the Division of Vocational-Technical Education are unable to achieve an equitable retirement under the current provisions of law, that the retirement laws regarding alternate retirement plans in Arkansas need to be changed to solve this inequitable situation, and that those laws need to be amended and this act needs to be effective at the beginning of the state fiscal biennium to continue the effective and efficient operation of the vocational-technical schools in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to promote effectiveness in state government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 332, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain staff members of the Arkansas Technical and Community College system are unable to achieve an equitable retirement under the current provisions of Arkansas law; that the retirement laws regarding alternate retirement plans in Arkansas need to be changed to solve this inequitable situation; and that those laws need to be amended and this act needs to be effective at the beginning of the state fiscal biennium to continue the effective and efficient operation of the Arkansas Technical and Community College system in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to promote effectiveness in state government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 944, § 6: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty- First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain staff members of the technical colleges, post-secondary vocational-technical schools and the Division of Vocational-Technical Education are unable to achieve an equitable retirement under the current provisions of Arkansas law for an alternate retirement plan; that the retirement laws regarding alternate retirement plans in Arkansas need to be changed to solve this inequitable situation; and that those laws need to be amended and this act needs to become effective at the beginning of the State's fiscal year to promote the proper operation of the vocational-technical colleges and schools in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to promote the effective financial administration of state government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 908, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain staff members of the technical colleges, post-secondary vocational-technical schools and the Department of Workforce Education are unable to achieve an equitable retirement under the current provisions of Arkansas law for an alternate retirement plan; that the retirement laws regarding alternate retirement plans in Arkansas need to be changed to solve this inequitable situation; and that those laws need to be amended and this act needs to become effective at the beginning of the state's fiscal year to promote the proper operation of the vocational-technical colleges and schools in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to promote the effective financial administration of state government, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 1784, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that that certain staff members of the technical colleges, post-secondary vocational-technical schools and the Department of Workforce Education are unable to achieve an equitable retirement under the current provisions of Arkansas law for an alternate retirement plan; that the retirement laws regarding alternate retirement plans in Arkansas need to be changed to solve this inequitable situation; and that those laws need to be amended and this act needs to become effective at the beginning of the state's fiscal year to promote the proper operation of the vocational-technical colleges and schools in Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.